Utah statutes.
4-21-4.   Refund of fees allowed -- Claim for refund to be filed with department -- Payment of refunds.

A person who objects to payment of the assessed fee may file a claim with the department within 60 days after the fee is collected.  No claim for refund, however, is allowed if it is filed more than 60 days after the date the fee is collected.  Each claim for refund shall be certified by the department to the state treasurer for payment from the beef promotion account, subject to any applicable provisions of the Beef Promotion and Research Act of 1985, 7 U.S.C.  Sec.  2901 et seq.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1986 Special Session 2

